Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 5 De Facto Parentage

15-8.1-501.
Adjudication.

In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of an individual who claims to be a de facto parent of the child, if there is only one other individual who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child, the court shall adjudicate the individual who claims to be a de facto parent to be a parent of the child if the individual demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that:

The individual resided with the child as a regular member of the child’s household for a significant period of time;

The individual engaged in consistent caretaking of the child;

The individual undertook full and permanent responsibilities of a parent of the child without expectation of financial compensation;

The individual held out the child as the person’s child;

The individual established a bonded and dependent relationship with the child which is parental in nature;

The individual and another parent of the child fostered or supported the bonded and dependent relationship required under subsection (a)(1)(v) of this section; and

Continuing the relationship between the individual and the child is in the best interests of the child.

A parent of the child may use evidence of duress, coercion, or threat of harm to contest an allegation that the parent fostered or supported a bonded and dependent relationship as provided in subsection (a)(1)(vi) of this section.

Such evidence may include whether within the prior ten (10) years, the individual seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent has been convicted of domestic assault, sexual assault, or sexual exploitation of the child or another parent of the child, was subject to a final abuse protection order pursuant to chapter 15 of title 15, because the individual was found to have committed abuse against the child or another parent of the child, or was substantiated for abuse against the child or another parent of the child pursuant to chapter 11 of title 40.

In a proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of an individual who claims to be a de facto parent of the child, if there is more than one other individual who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child and the court determines that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section are met by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall adjudicate parentage under §

15-8.1-206

, subject to other applicable limitations in this chapter.

The adjudication of an individual as a de facto parent under this chapter does not disestablish the parentage of any other parent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-502.
Complaint.

An individual seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent of a child shall file a complaint with the family court before the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. Both the individual seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent and the child must be alive at the time of the filing. The complaint shall include a verified affidavit alleging facts to support the existence of a de facto parent relationship with the child. The complaint and affidavit shall be served on all parents and legal guardians of the child and any other party to the proceeding.

An adverse party, parent, or legal guardian may file a pleading and verified affidavit in response to the petition that shall be served on all parties to the proceeding.

The court shall determine on the basis of the pleadings and affidavits whether the person seeking to be adjudicated a de facto parent has presented prima facie evidence of the criteria for de facto parentage as provided in §

15-8.1-501(a)

and, therefore, has standing to proceed with a parentage action. The court, in its sole discretion, may hold a hearing to determine disputed facts that are necessary and material to the issue of standing.

The court may enter an interim order concerning contact between the child and an individual with standing seeking adjudication under this chapter as a de facto parent of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.